Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1012.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 4-210, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-210. Grounds for revocation, suspension and refusal to renew; notice; complaints; hearings; defense A. After notice and hearing, the director may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew any license, registration, lease or permit issued pursuant to this chapter for any of the following reasons: 1. There occurs on the licensed premises repeated acts of violence. 2. The licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee fails to satisfactorily maintain the capability, qualifications and reliability requirements of an applicant for a license, registration, lease or permit prescribed in section 4-202, 4-203, 4-203.06, 4-203.07 or 4-205.13. 3. The licensee, registrant, lessee, permittee or controlling person knowingly files with the department an application or other document that contains material information that is false or misleading or while under oath knowingly gives testimony in an investigation or other proceeding under this title that is false or misleading. 4. The licensee, registrant, lessee, permittee or controlling person is on the premises habitually intoxicated. 5. The licensed, registered, leased or permitted business is delinquent for more than one hundred twenty days in paying taxes, penalties or interest in an amount that exceeds $250 to this state or to any political subdivision of this state. 6. The licensee or controlling person obtains, assigns, transfers or sells a spirituous liquor license without complying with this title or leases or subleases a license. 7. The licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee fails to keep for two years and make available to the department on reasonable request all invoices, records, bills or other papers and documents relating to the purchase, sale and delivery of spirituous liquors and, in the case of a restaurant or hotel-motel licensee, all invoices, records, bills or other papers and documents relating to the purchase, sale and delivery of food. 8. The licensee, registrant, lessee, permittee or controlling person is convicted of a felony, provided that for a conviction of a corporation to serve as a reason for any action by the director, conduct that constitutes the corporate offense and was the basis for the felony conviction must have been engaged in, authorized, solicited, commanded or recklessly tolerated by the directors of the corporation or by a high managerial agent acting within the scope of employment. 9. The licensee, registrant, lessee, permittee or controlling person violates or fails to comply with this title, any rule adopted pursuant to this title or any liquor law of this state or any other state. 10. The licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee fails to take reasonable steps to protect the safety of a customer of the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee or any other person entering, leaving or remaining on the licensed premises when the licensee knew or reasonably should have known of the danger to the person, or the licensee fails to take reasonable steps to intervene by notifying law enforcement officials or otherwise to prevent or break up an act of violence occurring on the licensed premises or immediately adjacent to the premises when the licensee knew or reasonably should have known of the acts of violence.  The duty to protect a customer or other person on the licensed premises does not limit the licensee from using, as necessary, reasonable intervention, reasonable restraint or reasonable removal of a person from the premises to prevent that person from injuring other persons on the premises or damaging or disrupting the premises. For the purposes of this paragraph, the presence of a concealed handgun does not create an obligation for a restaurant licensee or the employee of a restaurant licensee to take reasonable steps to intervene or to notify law enforcement officials if the licensee reasonably believes that the concealed handgun is being carried in compliance with section 4-229. 11. The licensee, registrant, lessee, permittee or controlling person knowingly associates with a person who has engaged in racketeering, as defined in section 13-2301, or who has been convicted of a felony, and the association is of a nature as to create a reasonable risk that the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee will fail to conform to the requirements of this title or of any criminal statute of this state. 12. A licensee that is a liquor store as defined in section 46-297 violates the restrictions on use of automatic teller machines or point-of-sale terminals regarding electronic benefit transfer cards prescribed in section 4-242.01. 13. There occurs on the licensed premises a serious act of violence.  This paragraph does not apply to a restaurant licensee if the serious act of violence is the result of a concealed handgun on the licensed premises unless the licensee or an employee of the licensee knew the person was carrying a concealed handgun and knowingly served the person spirituous liquor that was intended for immediate consumption.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "serious act of violence" means an act of violence in which a serious injury causes the death or critical injury of a person and the injuries would be obvious to a reasonable person. 14. The licensee fails to report a serious act of violence that occurs on the licensed premises.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "serious act of violence" means an act of violence in which a serious injury causes the death or critical injury of a person and the injuries would be obvious to a reasonable person. 15. The licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee violates an order of the board. B. For the purposes of: 1. Subsection A, paragraph 8 of this section, "high managerial agent" means an officer of a corporation or any other agent of the corporation in a position of comparable authority with respect to the formulation of corporate policy. 2. Subsection A, paragraphs 9 and 10 of this section, acts or omissions of an employee of a licensee that violate this title or rules adopted pursuant to this title are deemed to be acts or omissions of the licensee.  Acts or omissions by an employee or licensee committed during the time the licensed premises were operated pursuant to an interim permit or without a license may be charged as if they had been committed during the period the premises were duly licensed. C. The director may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue, transfer or renew a license, registration, lease or permit under this section based solely on the unrelated conduct or fitness of any officer, director, managing agent or other controlling person if the controlling person retains any interest in or control of the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee after sixty days following written notice to the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee. If the controlling person holds stock in a corporate licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee or is a partner in a partnership licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee, the controlling person may only divest himself of the controlling person's interest by transferring the interest to the existing stockholders or partners who must demonstrate to the department that they meet all the requirements for licensure, registration, leasing or permitting.  For the purposes of this subsection, the conduct or fitness of a controlling person is unrelated if it would not be attributable to the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee. D. If the director finds, based on clear and convincing evidence in the record, that a violation involves the use by the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee of a drive-through or walk-up service window or other physical feature of the licensed premises that allows a customer to purchase spirituous liquor without leaving the customer's vehicle or, with respect to a walk-up service window that prevents the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee from fully observing the customer, and that the use of that drive-through or walk-up service window or other physical feature caused the violation, the director may suspend or terminate the licensee's, registrant's, lessee's or permittee's use of the drive-through or walk-up service window or other physical feature for the sale of spirituous liquor, in addition to any other sanction. E. The director may refuse to transfer any license, registration, lease or permit or issue a new license, registration, lease or permit at the same location if the director has filed a complaint against the license, registration, lease, permit or location that has not been resolved alleging a violation of any of the grounds stated in subsection A of this section until the time the complaint has been finally adjudicated. F. The director shall receive all complaints of alleged violations of this chapter and is responsible for investigating all allegations of a violation of, or noncompliance with, this title, any rule adopted pursuant to this title or any condition imposed on the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee by the license, registration, lease or permit. When the director receives three complaints from any law enforcement agency resulting from three separate incidents at a licensed, leased or permitted establishment or by a registrant within a twelve-month period, the director shall transmit a written report to the board setting forth the complaints, the results of any investigation conducted by the law enforcement agency or the department relating to the complaints and a history of all prior complaints against the license, registration, lease or permit and their disposition. The board shall review the report and may direct the director to conduct further investigation of a complaint or to serve a licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee with a complaint and notice of a hearing pursuant to subsection G of this section. G. On the director's initiation of an investigation or on the receipt of a complaint and an investigation of the complaint as deemed necessary, the director may cause a complaint and notice of a hearing to be directed to the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee that states the violations alleged against the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee and directing the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee, within fifteen days after service of the complaint and notice of a hearing, to appear by filing with the director an answer to the complaint.  Failure of the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee to answer may be deemed an admission by the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee of commission of the act charged in the complaint. The director may then vacate the hearing and impose any sanction provided by this article.  The director may waive any sanction for good cause shown, including excusable neglect. With respect to any violation of this title or any rule adopted pursuant to this title that is based on the act or omission of a licensee's, registrant's, lessee's or permittee's employee, the director shall consider evidence of mitigation presented by the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee and established by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee acted intentionally and in violation of the express direction or policy adopted by the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee and communicated to the employee and that the employee successfully completed training in a course approved by the director pursuant to section 4-112, subsection G, paragraph 2. The director may set the hearing before the director or an administrative law judge on any of the grounds stated in subsection A of this section. Instead of issuing a complaint, the director may provide for informal disposition of the matter by consent agreement or may issue a written warning to the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee.  If a warning is issued, the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee may reply in writing and the director shall keep a record of the warning and the reply. H. A hearing shall conform to the requirements of title 41, chapter 6, article 10. At the hearing an attorney or corporate officer or employee of a corporation may represent the corporation. The revoking, suspending or refusing to renew a license, registration, lease or permit for unpaid taxes, penalties or interest pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section is a contested case with the department of revenue pursuant to section 42-1251.01. I. The expiration, cancellation, revocation, reversion, surrender, acceptance of surrender or termination in any other manner of a license, registration, lease or permit does not prevent the initiation or completion of a disciplinary proceeding pursuant to this section against the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee or license, registration, lease or permit.  An order issued pursuant to a disciplinary proceeding against a license, registration, lease or permit is enforceable against other licenses, registrations, leases or permits or subsequent licenses, registrations, leases or permits in which the licensee, registrant, lessee, permittee or controlling person of the license, registration, lease or permit has a controlling interest. J. The department shall provide the same notice as is provided to the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee to a lienholder, which has provided a document under section 4-112, subsection B, paragraph 3, of all disciplinary or compliance action with respect to a license, registration, lease or permit issued pursuant to this title. The state is not liable for damages for any failure to provide any notice pursuant to this subsection. K. In any disciplinary action pursuant to this title, a lienholder may participate in the determination of the action.  The director shall consider mitigation on behalf of the lienholder if the lienholder proves all of the following by a preponderance of the evidence: 1. That the lienholder's interest is a bona fide security interest.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "bona fide security interest" means the lienholder provides actual consideration to the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee or the licensee's, registrant's, lessee's or permittee's predecessor in interest in exchange for the lienholder's interest.  Bona fide security interest includes a lien taken by the seller of a license, registration, lease or permit as security for the seller's receipt of all or part of the purchase price of the license, registration, lease or permit. 2. That a statement of legal or equitable interest was filed with the department before the alleged conduct occurred that is the basis for the action against the license, registration, lease or permit. 3. That the lienholder took reasonable steps to correct the licensee's, registrant's, lessee's or permittee's prior actions, if any, or initiated an action pursuant to available contract rights against the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee for the forfeiture of the license, registration, lease or permit after being provided with notice by the department of disciplinary action as provided in subsection J of this section. 4. That the lienholder was free of responsibility for the conduct that is the basis for the proposed revocation. 5. That the lienholder reasonably attempted to remain informed by the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee about the business's conduct. L. If the director decides not to revoke the license, registration, lease or permit based on the circumstances provided in subsection K of this section, the director may issue an order requiring either, or both, of the following: 1. The forfeiture of all interest of the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee in the license, registration, lease or permit. 2. The lienholder to pay any civil monetary penalty imposed on the licensee, registrant, lessee or permittee. M. If any on-sale licensee proposes to provide large capacity entertainment events or sporting events with an attendance capacity exceeding a limit established by the director, the director may request a security plan from the licensee that may include trained security officers, lighting and other requirements. This subsection exclusively prescribes the security requirements for a licensee and does not create any civil liability for this state, its agencies, agents or employees or a person licensed under this title or agents or employees of a licensee. N. The director may consider as a mitigating factor or defense to a complaint against a licensee for a violation of subsection A, paragraph 10 or 13 of this section that the licensee acted reasonably, responsibly and as expeditiously as possible by asking for intervention by a peace officer to prevent or to break up a riot, a fight, an altercation or tumultuous conduct. o. Notwithstanding any other law, the director may not suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a restaurant license or permit that has been issued pursuant to section 4-205.02 if the basis of the suspension, revocation or refusal to renew is based on a person carrying a concealed handgun on the premises of the restaurant licensee. There is a presumption that a person in possession of a concealed handgun on the premises of a restaurant licensee is carrying the concealed handgun in compliance with section 4-229 and No additional verification of COMPLIANCE with section 4-229 is required by a restaurant licensee or an employee of the restaurant licensee. P. Notwithstanding any other law, The director may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a restaurant license or permit that is issued pursuant to section 4-205.02 for a violation that involves a concealed handgun on the premises of a restaurant licensee if the director shows that the restaurant licensee acted with gross negligence and that the gross negligence was the direct cause of the basis of the complaint and violation. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 4-229, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-229. Licenses; concealed carry permits; concealed handguns; posting of notice A. A person may carry a concealed handgun on the premises of a restaurant that is licensed pursuant to section 4-205.02 if both of the following apply: 1. The restaurant licensee has no other license ATTACHED to the premises. 2. The person has a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 and does not consume spirituous liquor on the licensed premises. A. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a person may carry a concealed handgun on the premises of a licensee who that is an on-sale retailer unless the licensee posts a sign that clearly prohibits the possession of weapons on the licensed premises. The sign shall conform to the following requirements: 1. Be posted in a conspicuous location accessible to the general public and immediately adjacent to the liquor license posted on the licensed premises. 2. Contain a pictogram that shows a firearm within a red circle and a diagonal red line across the firearm. 3. Contain the words, "no firearms allowed pursuant to A.R.S. section 4-229". B. C. A person shall not carry a firearm on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer if the licensee has posted the notice prescribed in subsection A  B of this section. C. D. It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection B  C of this section if: 1. The person was not informed of the notice prescribed in subsection A  B of this section before the violation. 2. Any one or more of the following apply: (a) At the time of the violation the notice prescribed in subsection A  B of this section had fallen down. (b) At the time of the violation the person was not a resident of this state. (c) The licensee had posted the notice prescribed in subsection A  B of this section not more than thirty days before the violation. D. E. The department of liquor licenses and control shall prepare the signs required by this section and make them available at no cost to licensees. E. F. The signs required by this section shall be composed of block, capital letters printed in black on white laminated paper at a minimum weight of one hundred ten pound index. The lettering and pictogram shall consume a space at least six inches by nine inches. The letters constituting the words "no firearms allowed" shall be at least three-fourths of a vertical inch and all other letters shall be at least one-half of a vertical inch. Nothing shall prohibit A licensee from posting may post additional signs at one or more locations on the premises. F. G. This section does not prohibit a person who possesses a handgun from entering the licensed premises for a limited time for the specific purpose of either: 1. Seeking emergency aid. 2. Determining whether a sign has been posted pursuant to subsection A  B of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 4-244, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-244. Unlawful acts; definition It is unlawful: 1. For a person to buy for resale, sell or deal in spirituous liquors in this state without first having procured a license duly issued by the board, except that the director may issue a temporary permit of any series pursuant to section 4-205.05 to a trustee in bankruptcy to acquire and dispose of the spirituous liquor of a debtor. 2. For a person to sell or deal in alcohol for beverage purposes without first complying with this title. 3. For a distiller, vintner, brewer or wholesaler knowingly to sell, dispose of or give spirituous liquor to any person other than a licensee except in sampling wares as may be necessary in the ordinary course of business, except in donating spirituous liquor to a nonprofit organization that has obtained a special event license for the purpose of charitable fundraising activities or except in donating spirituous liquor with a cost to the distiller, brewer or wholesaler of up to $500 in a calendar year to an organization that is exempt from federal income taxes under section 501(c) (3), (4), (6) or (7) of the internal revenue code and not licensed under this title. 4. For a distiller, vintner or brewer to require a wholesaler to offer or grant a discount to a retailer, unless the discount has also been offered and granted to the wholesaler by the distiller, vintner or brewer. 5. For a distiller, vintner or brewer to use a vehicle for trucking or transporting spirituous liquors unless there is affixed to both sides of the vehicle a sign showing the name and address of the licensee and the type and number of the person's license in letters not less than three and one-half inches in height. 6. For a person to take or solicit orders for spirituous liquors unless the person is a salesman or solicitor of a licensed wholesaler, a salesman or solicitor of a distiller, brewer, vintner, importer or broker or a registered retail agent. 7. For any retail licensee to purchase spirituous liquors from any person other than a solicitor or salesman of a wholesaler licensed in this state. 8. For a retailer to acquire an interest in property owned, occupied or used by a wholesaler in the wholesaler's business, or in a license with respect to the premises of the wholesaler. 9. Except as provided in paragraphs 10 and 11 of this section, for a licensee or other person to sell, furnish, dispose of or give, or cause to be sold, furnished, disposed of or given, to a person under the legal drinking age or for a person under the legal drinking age to buy, receive, have in the person's possession or consume spirituous liquor. This paragraph does not prohibit the employment by an off-sale retailer of persons who are at least sixteen years of age to check out, if supervised by a person on the premises who is at least eighteen years of age, package or carry merchandise, including spirituous liquor, in unbroken packages, for the convenience of the customer of the employer, if the employer sells primarily merchandise other than spirituous liquor. 10. For a licensee to employ a person under eighteen years of age to manufacture, sell or dispose of spirituous liquors. This paragraph does not prohibit the employment by an off-sale retailer of persons who are at least sixteen years of age to check out, if supervised by a person on the premises who is at least eighteen years of age, package or carry merchandise, including spirituous liquor, in unbroken packages, for the convenience of the customer of the employer, if the employer sells primarily merchandise other than spirituous liquor. 11. For an on-sale retailer to employ a person under eighteen years of age in any capacity connected with the handling of spirituous liquors.  This paragraph does not prohibit the employment by an on-sale retailer of a person under eighteen years of age who cleans up the tables on the premises for reuse, removes dirty dishes, keeps a ready supply of needed items and helps clean up the premises. 12. For a licensee, when engaged in waiting on or serving customers, to consume spirituous liquor or for a licensee or on-duty employee to be on or about the licensed premises while in an intoxicated or disorderly condition. 13. For an employee of a retail licensee, during that employee's working hours or in connection with such employment, to give to or purchase for any other person, accept a gift of, purchase for the employee or consume spirituous liquor, except that: (a) An employee of a licensee, during that employee's working hours or in connection with the employment, while the employee is not engaged in waiting on or serving customers, may give spirituous liquor to or purchase spirituous liquor for any other person. (b) An employee of an on-sale retail licensee, during that employee's working hours or in connection with the employment, while the employee is not engaged in waiting on or serving customers, may taste samples of beer or wine of not more than four ounces per day or distilled spirits of not more than two ounces per day provided by an employee of a wholesaler or distributor who is present at the time of the sampling. (c) An employee of an on-sale retail licensee, under the supervision of a manager as part of the employee's training and education, while not engaged in waiting on or serving customers may taste samples of distilled spirits of not more than two ounces per educational session or beer or wine of not more than four ounces per educational session, and provided that a licensee does not have more than two educational sessions in any thirty-day period. (d) An unpaid volunteer who is a bona fide member of a club and who is not engaged in waiting on or serving spirituous liquor to customers may purchase for himself and consume spirituous liquor while participating in a scheduled event at the club. An unpaid participant in a food competition may purchase for himself and consume spirituous liquor while participating in the food competition. (e) An unpaid volunteer of a special event licensee under section 4-203.02 may purchase and consume spirituous liquor while not engaged in waiting on or serving spirituous liquor to customers at the special event.  This subdivision does not apply to an unpaid volunteer whose responsibilities include verification of a person's legal drinking age, security or the operation of any vehicle or heavy machinery. (f) A representative of a producer or wholesaler participating at a special event under section 4-203.02 may consume small amounts of the products of the producer or wholesaler on the premises of the special event for the purpose of quality control. 14. For a licensee or other person to serve, sell or furnish spirituous liquor to a disorderly or obviously intoxicated person, or for a licensee or employee of the licensee to allow a disorderly or obviously intoxicated person to come into or remain on or about the premises, except that a licensee or an employee of the licensee may allow an obviously intoxicated person to remain on the premises for not more than thirty minutes after the state of obvious intoxication is known or should be known to the licensee for a nonintoxicated person to transport the obviously intoxicated person from the premises. For the purposes of this section, "obviously intoxicated" means inebriated to the extent that a person's physical faculties are substantially impaired and the impairment is shown by significantly uncoordinated physical action or significant physical dysfunction that would have been obvious to a reasonable person. 15. For an on-sale or off-sale retailer or an employee of such retailer or an alcohol delivery contractor to sell, dispose of, deliver or give spirituous liquor to a person between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., except that: (a) A retailer with off-sale privileges may receive and process orders, accept payment or package, load or otherwise prepare spirituous liquor for delivery at any time, if the actual deliveries to customers are made between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 2:00 a.m., at which time section 4-241, subsections A and K apply. (b) The governor, in consultation with the governor's office of highway safety and the public safety community in this state, may issue an executive order that extends the closing time until 3:00 a.m. for spirituous liquor sales in connection with a professional or collegiate national sporting championship event held in this state. 16. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow any person on or about the licensed premises to give or furnish any spirituous liquor to any person under twenty-one years of age or knowingly allow any person under twenty-one years of age to have in the person's possession spirituous liquor on the licensed premises. 17. For an on-sale retailer or an employee of such retailer to allow a person to consume or possess spirituous liquors on the premises between the hours of 2:30 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., except that if the governor extends the closing time for a day for spirituous liquor sales pursuant to paragraph 15 of this section it is unlawful for an on-sale retailer or an employee of such retailer on that day to allow a person to consume or possess spirituous liquor on the premises between the hours of 3:30 a.m. and 6:00 a.m. 18. For an on-sale retailer to allow an employee or for an employee to solicit or encourage others, directly or indirectly, to buy the employee drinks or anything of value in the licensed premises during the employee's working hours. An on-sale retailer shall not serve employees or allow a patron of the establishment to give spirituous liquor to, purchase liquor for or drink liquor with any employee during the employee's working hours. 19. For an off-sale retailer or employee to sell spirituous liquor except in the original unbroken container, to allow spirituous liquor to be consumed on the premises or to knowingly allow spirituous liquor to be consumed on adjacent property under the licensee's exclusive control. 20. For a person to consume spirituous liquor in a public place, thoroughfare or gathering. The license of a licensee allowing a violation of this paragraph on the premises shall be subject to revocation. This paragraph does not apply to the sale of spirituous liquors on the premises of and by an on-sale retailer. This paragraph also does not apply to a person consuming beer or wine from a broken package in a public recreation area or on private property with permission of the owner or lessor or on the walkways surrounding such private property or to a person consuming beer or wine from a broken package in a public recreation area as part of a special event or festival that is conducted under a license secured pursuant to section 4-203.02 or 4-203.03. 21. For a person to possess or to transport spirituous liquor that is manufactured in a distillery, winery, brewery or rectifying plant contrary to the laws of the United States and this state. Any property used in transporting such spirituous liquor shall be forfeited to the state and shall be seized and disposed of as provided in section 4-221. 22. For an on-sale retailer or employee to allow a person under the legal drinking age to remain in an area on the licensed premises during those hours in which its primary use is the sale, dispensing or consumption of alcoholic beverages after the licensee, or the licensee's employees, know or should have known that the person is under the legal drinking age. An on-sale retailer may designate an area of the licensed premises as an area in which spirituous liquor will not be sold or consumed for the purpose of allowing to allow underage persons on the premises if the designated area is separated by a physical barrier and at no time will underage persons have access to the area in which spirituous liquor is sold or consumed. A licensee or an employee of a licensee may require a person who intends to enter a licensed premises or a portion of a licensed premises where persons under the legal drinking age are prohibited under this section to exhibit an instrument of identification that is acceptable under section 4-241 as a condition of entry or may use a biometric identity verification device to determine the person's age as a condition of entry. The director, or a municipality, may adopt rules to regulate the presence of underage persons on licensed premises provided the rules adopted by a municipality are more stringent than those adopted by the director. The rules adopted by the municipality shall be adopted by local ordinance and shall not interfere with the licensee's ability to comply with this paragraph. This paragraph does not apply: (a) If the person under the legal drinking age is accompanied by a spouse, parent, grandparent or legal guardian of legal drinking age or is an on-duty employee of the licensee. (b) If the owner, lessee or occupant of the premises is a club as defined in section 4-101, paragraph 8, subdivision (a) and the person under the legal drinking age is any of the following: (i) An active duty military service member. (ii) A veteran. (iii) A member of the United States army national guard or the United States air national guard. (iv) A member of the United States military reserve forces. (c) To the area of the premises used primarily for serving food during the hours when food is served. 23. For an on-sale retailer or employee to conduct drinking contests, to sell or deliver to a person an unlimited number of spirituous liquor beverages during any set period of time for a fixed price, to deliver more than fifty ounces of beer, one liter of wine or four ounces of distilled spirits in any spirituous liquor drink to one person at one time for that person's consumption or to advertise any practice prohibited by this paragraph. This paragraph does not prohibit an on-sale retailer or employee from selling and delivering an opened, original container of distilled spirits if: (a) Service or pouring of the spirituous liquor is provided by an employee of the on-sale retailer. A licensee shall not be charged for a violation of this paragraph if a customer, without the knowledge of the retailer, removes or tampers with a locking device on a bottle delivered to the customer for bottle service and the customer pours the customer's own drink from the bottle, if when the licensee becomes aware of the removal or tampering of the locking device the licensee immediately installs a functioning locking device on the bottle or removes the bottle and lock from bottle service. (b) The employee of the on-sale retailer monitors consumption to ensure compliance with this paragraph. Locking devices may be used, but are not required. 24. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow the unlawful possession, use, sale or offer for sale of narcotics, dangerous drugs or marijuana on the premises. For the purposes of this paragraph, "dangerous drug" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3401. 25. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow prostitution or the solicitation of prostitution on the premises. 26. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow unlawful gambling on the premises. 27. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow trafficking or attempted trafficking in stolen property on the premises. 28. For a licensee or employee to fail or refuse to make the premises or records available for inspection and examination as provided in this title or to comply with a lawful subpoena issued under this title. 29. For any person other than a peace officer while on duty or off duty or a member of a sheriff's volunteer posse while on duty who has received firearms training that is approved by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board, a retired peace officer as defined in section 38-1113 or an honorably retired law enforcement officer who has been issued a certificate of firearms proficiency pursuant to section 13-3112, subsection T, the licensee or an employee of the licensee acting with the permission of the licensee to be in possession of a firearm while on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer. This paragraph does not include a situation in which a person is on licensed premises for a limited time in order to seek emergency aid and such person does not buy, receive, consume or possess spirituous liquor. This paragraph does not apply to: (a) Hotel or motel guest room accommodations. (b) Exhibiting or displaying a firearm in conjunction with a meeting, show, class or similar event. (c) A person with a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 who carries a concealed handgun on the licensed premises of any on-sale retailer that has not posted a notice pursuant to section 4-229, subsection B. (d) A person with a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 who carries a concealed handgun on the premises of a restaurant that is licensed pursuant to section 4-205.02 and who does not consume spirituous liquor on the licensed premises. 30. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow a person in possession of a firearm other than a peace officer while on duty or off duty or a member of a sheriff's volunteer posse while on duty who has received firearms training that is approved by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board, a retired peace officer as defined in section 38-1113 or an honorably retired law enforcement officer who has been issued a certificate of firearms proficiency pursuant to section 13-3112, subsection T, the licensee or an employee of the licensee acting with the permission of the licensee to remain on the licensed premises or to serve, sell or furnish spirituous liquor to a person in possession of a firearm while on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer. It is a defense to action under this paragraph if the licensee or employee requested assistance of a peace officer to remove such person.  This paragraph does not create an obligation for a licensee or an employee of a licensee to inquire, investigate or otherwise determine whether a person with a concealed handgun has a permit that has been issued pursuant to section 13-3112. This paragraph does not apply to: (a) Hotel or motel guest room accommodations. (b) Exhibiting or displaying a firearm in conjunction with a meeting, show, class or similar event. (c) A person with a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 who carries a concealed handgun on the licensed premises of any on-sale retailer that has not posted a notice pursuant to section 4-229, subsection B. (d) A person with a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 who carries a concealed handgun on the premises of a restaurant that is licensed pursuant to section 4-205.02 and who does not consume spirituous liquor on the licensed premises. 31. For any person in possession of a firearm while on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer to consume spirituous liquor. This paragraph does not prohibit the consumption of small amounts of spirituous liquor by an undercover peace officer on assignment to investigate the licensed establishment. 32. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow spirituous liquor to be removed from the licensed premises, except in the original unbroken package. This paragraph does not apply to any of the following: (a) A person who removes a bottle of wine that has been partially consumed in conjunction with a purchased meal from licensed premises if a cork is inserted flush with the top of the bottle or the bottle is otherwise securely closed. (b) A person who is in licensed premises that have noncontiguous portions that are separated by a public or private walkway or driveway and who takes spirituous liquor from one portion of the licensed premises across the public or private walkway or driveway directly to the other portion of the licensed premises. (c) A licensee of a bar, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store, microbrewery or restaurant that has a permit pursuant to section 4-205.02, subsection H that dispenses beer only in a clean container composed of a material approved by a national sanitation organization with a maximum capacity that does not exceed one gallon and not for consumption on the premises if: (i) The licensee or the licensee's employee fills the container at the tap at the time of sale. (ii) The container is sealed and displays a government warning label. (d) A bar or liquor store licensee that prepares a mixed cocktail or a restaurant licensee that leases the privilege to sell mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises pursuant to section 4-203.06 or holds a permit pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-205.02, subsection K and that prepares a mixed cocktail and transfers it to a clean container composed of a material approved by a national sanitation organization with a maximum capacity that does not exceed thirty-two ounces and not for consumption on the premises if all of the following apply: (i) The licensee or licensee's employee fills the container with the mixed cocktail on the licensed premises of the bar, liquor store or restaurant. (ii) The container is tamperproof sealed by the licensee or the licensee's employee and displays a government warning label. (iii) The container clearly displays the bar's, liquor store's or restaurant's logo or name. (iv) For a restaurant licensee licensed pursuant to section 4-205.02, the sale of mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises is accompanied by the sale of menu food items for consumption on or off the licensed premises. 33. For a person who is obviously intoxicated to buy or attempt to buy spirituous liquor from a licensee or employee of a licensee or to consume spirituous liquor on licensed premises. 34. For a person who is under twenty-one years of age to drive or be in physical control of a motor vehicle while there is any spirituous liquor in the person's body. 35. For a person who is under twenty-one years of age to operate or be in physical control of a motorized watercraft that is underway while there is any spirituous liquor in the person's body. For the purposes of this paragraph, "underway" has the same meaning prescribed in section 5-301. 36. For a licensee, manager, employee or controlling person to purposely induce a voter, by means of alcohol, to vote or abstain from voting for or against a particular candidate or issue on an election day. 37. For a licensee to fail to report an occurrence of an act of violence to either the department or a law enforcement agency. 38. For a licensee to use a vending machine for the purpose of dispensing to dispense spirituous liquor. 39. For a licensee to offer for sale a wine carrying a label including a reference to Arizona or any Arizona city, town or geographic location unless at least seventy-five percent by volume of the grapes used in making the wine were grown in Arizona. 40. For a retailer to knowingly allow a customer to bring spirituous liquor onto the licensed premises, except that an on-sale retailer may allow a wine and food club to bring wine onto the premises for consumption by the club's members and guests of the club's members in conjunction with meals purchased at a meeting of the club that is conducted on the premises and that at least seven members attend. An on-sale retailer that allows wine and food clubs to bring wine onto its premises under this paragraph shall comply with all applicable provisions of this title and any rules adopted pursuant to this title to the same extent as if the on-sale retailer had sold the wine to the members of the club and their guests. For the purposes of this paragraph, "wine and food club" means an association that has more than twenty bona fide members paying at least $6 per year in dues and that has been in existence for at least one year. 41. For a person who is under twenty-one years of age to have in the person's body any spirituous liquor. In a prosecution for a violation of this paragraph: (a) Pursuant to section 4-249, it is a defense that the spirituous liquor was consumed in connection with the bona fide practice of a religious belief or as an integral part of a religious exercise and in a manner not dangerous to public health or safety. (b) Pursuant to section 4-226, it is a defense that the spirituous liquor was consumed for a bona fide medicinal purpose and in a manner not dangerous to public health or safety. 42. For an employee of a licensee to accept any gratuity, compensation, remuneration or consideration of any kind to either: (a) Allow a person who is under twenty-one years of age to enter any portion of the premises where that person is prohibited from entering pursuant to paragraph 22 of this section. (b) Sell, furnish, dispose of or give spirituous liquor to a person who is under twenty-one years of age. 43. For a person to purchase, offer for sale or use any device, machine or process that mixes spirituous liquor with pure oxygen or another gas to produce a vaporized product for the purpose of consumption by inhalation or to allow patrons to use any item for the consumption of vaporized spirituous liquor. 44. For a retail licensee or an employee of a retail licensee to sell spirituous liquor to a person if the retail licensee or employee knows the person intends to resell the spirituous liquor. 45. Except as authorized by paragraph 32, subdivision (c) of this section, for a person to reuse a bottle or other container authorized for use by the laws of the United States or any agency of the United States for the packaging of distilled spirits or for a person to increase the original contents or a portion of the original contents remaining in a liquor bottle or other authorized container by adding any substance. 46. For a direct shipment licensee, a farm winery licensee or an employee of those licensees to sell, dispose of, deliver or give spirituous liquor to an individual purchaser between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., except that a direct shipment licensee or a farm winery licensee may receive and process orders, accept payment, package, load or otherwise prepare wine for delivery at any time without complying with section 4-241, subsections A and K, if the actual deliveries to individual purchasers are made between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 2:00 a.m. and in accordance with section 4-203.04 for direct shipment licensees and section 4-205.04 for farm winery licensees. 47. For a supplier to coerce or attempt to coerce a wholesaler to accept delivery of beer or any other commodity that has not been ordered by the wholesaler or for which the order was canceled. A supplier may impose reasonable inventory requirements on a wholesaler if the requirements are made in good faith and are generally applied to other similarly situated wholesalers that have an agreement with the supplier. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 4-246, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-246. Violation; classification; fine; civil penalty A. A person violating any provision of this title is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor unless another classification is prescribed. B. A person violating section 4-242.01, subsection A or section 4-244, paragraph 9, 14, 34, 42 or 44 is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. C. A person violating section 4-229, subsection B or section 4-244, paragraph 31 is guilty of a class 3 misdemeanor. D. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, the court may suspend the privilege to drive of a person who is under eighteen years of age for a period of up to one hundred eighty days on receiving the record of the person's first conviction for a violation of section 4-244, paragraph 9. E. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, a person who is convicted of a violation of section 4-244, paragraph 42 shall pay a fine of at least $500. F. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, a person who is convicted of a violation of section 4-241, subsection L, M or N shall pay a fine of at least $250. G. A person that violates section 4-244, paragraph 47 is subject to a civil penalty as prescribed in section 4-210.01. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 4-311, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-311. Liability for serving intoxicated person or minor; exceptions; definition A. A licensee is liable for property damage and personal injuries or is liable to a person who may bring an action for wrongful death pursuant to section 12-612, or both, if a court or jury finds all of the following: 1. The licensee sold spirituous liquor either to a purchaser who was obviously intoxicated, or to a purchaser under the legal drinking age without requesting identification containing proof of age or with knowledge that the person was under the legal drinking age. 2. The purchaser consumed the spirituous liquor sold by the licensee. 3. The consumption of spirituous liquor was a proximate cause of the injury, death or property damage. B. Notwithstanding any other law, a licensee is not liable for property damage or personal injuries or to a person who may bring an action for wrongful death pursuant to section 12-612, or both, if the property damage, personal injury or wrongful death was caused by a concealed handgun that was carried on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer unless a court or jury finds one of the following: 1. The licensee or an employee of the licensee served spirituous liquor to the person who the licensee or employee of the licensee knew was carrying a concealed handgun. 2. The licensee or an employee of the licensee knew that the person was carrying a concealed handgun in violation of section 4-229 and the licensee or employee of the licensee failed to notify a law enforcement agency. B. c. No A licensee is not chargeable with knowledge of previous acts by which a person becomes intoxicated at other locations unknown to the licensee unless the person was obviously intoxicated. If the licensee operates under a restaurant license, the finder of fact shall not consider any information obtained as a result of a restaurant audit conducted pursuant to section 4-213 unless the court finds the information relevant. C. d. For the purposes of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section, if it is found that an underage person purchased spirituous liquor from a licensee and such underage person incurs or causes injuries or property damage as a result of the consumption of spirituous liquor within a reasonable period of time following the sale of the spirituous liquor, it shall create a rebuttable presumption that the underage person consumed the spirituous liquor sold to such person by the licensee. D. e. For the purposes of this section, "obviously intoxicated" means inebriated to such an extent that a person's physical faculties are substantially impaired and the impairment is shown by significantly uncoordinated physical action or significant physical dysfunction that would have been obvious to a reasonable person. END_STATUTE